Utah statutes.
31A-21-310.   Dividends on policies.
(1)  Section 31A-22-418 applies to life insurance and annuities.
(2)  Any insurer may distribute a portion of surplus attributable to policies
other than life insurance or annuities, in amounts and with classifications
the board of directors determines to be fair and reasonable.  This
distribution may not be contingent on the renewal of any policy or of premium
payments unless the policy stated that limitation when it was written.  A
schedule explaining the basis for the distribution shall be filed with the
commissioner prior to the distribution.  The schedule shall be kept
confidential by the commissioner unless he finds that the interests of
insureds and the public require that it be made public.
(3)  Any insurer may distribute surplus to any class of policyholder, even if
their policies do not provide for it.  A schedule explaining the basis for the
distribution shall be filed with the commissioner under Subsection (2) at
least 30 days prior to the distribution.  The commissioner shall disallow any
distribution which is materially unfair to other policyholders or which would
place the insurer in a financially hazardous condition.
(4)  It is permissible to provide an indivisible dividend to classes of
policyholders having more than one type of policy, including a combination of
life or annuities with other types of insurance.
